Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2248
State long-term care ombudsman, defined.

State long-term care ombudsman means the person appointed under section 81-2249 to fulfill the responsibilities of the office.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 767;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 13.